test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-a-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
#Present participle, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: рӯпитанэ̄нум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: рӯпитанэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: рӯпитанэ̄нэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: [рӯпитанэнаме̄н, рӯпитанэнанме̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: [рӯпитанэны̄н, рӯпитанэныны̄н, рӯпитанэнаны̄н] 
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [рӯпитанэнэ̄н, рӯпитанэнанэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [рӯпитанэнув, рӯпитанэнӯв, рӯпитанэнанув, рӯпитанэнанӯв]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [рӯпитанэны̄н, рӯпитанэнаны̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [рӯпитанэ̄нл, рӯпитанэ̄наныл]

#Past participle
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc: рӯпитам
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: рӯпитамум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: рӯпитамын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: рӯпитаме
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: рӯпитамаме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [рӯпитамын, рӯпитамы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: рӯпитамыг
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [рӯпитамув, рӯпитамӯв]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [рӯпитамын, рӯпитамы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: рӯпитамыт

#Past participle, single object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: рӯпитамылум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: рӯпитамылын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: рӯпитамытэ
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: рӯпитамыламе̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: рӯпитамылы̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: рӯпитамытэ̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [рӯпитамылув, рӯпитамылӯв]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: рӯпитамылы̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: рӯпитаманыл

#Past participle, dual object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: рӯпитамагум
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: рӯпитамагын
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: рӯпитамаге
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: [рӯпитамагаме̄н, рӯпитамагагме̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [рӯпитамагы̄н, рӯпитамагагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [рӯпитамагы̄г, рӯпитамагагы̄г]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [рӯпитамагув, рӯпитамвгӯв]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [рӯпитамагы̄н, рӯпитамагагы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: [рӯпитамагагыл, рӯпитамагаганыл]

#Past participle, plural object
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: [рӯпитаманум, рӯпитамананум]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: [рӯпитаман, рӯпитама̄нын]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: [рӯпитама̄нэ, рӯпитамана̄нэ]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: [рӯпитаманаме̄н, рӯпитамананме̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [рӯпитаманн, рӯпитаманы̄н, рӯпитамананы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [рӯпитаманэ̄н, рӯпитамананэ̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [рӯпитаманув, рӯпитаманӯв, рӯпитамананув, рӯпитамананӯв]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [рӯпитаманы̄н, рӯпитамананы̄н]
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: [рӯпитама̄ныл, рӯпитамана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Ger: рӯпитым
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: рӯпитымам
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: рӯпитыман
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: рӯпитыма
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: рӯпитымаме̄н
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: рӯпитыман
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: рӯпитнсымаг
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: рӯпитымав
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: рӯпитыман
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: рӯпитымат

#Privative
    рӯпитаӈкве+V+Ger: рӯпаттал
